tools/suffixes/adjectives/nAdj.lexc
!Copyright (C) 2019 Hélio L. B. Silva
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License Version 3

Multichar_Symbols +A +M +F +SG +PL

LEXICON Root
<@txt"nAdj.lemas">	Adjetivo;

LEXICON Adjetivo
+A:0	Gênero;

LEXICON Gênero
+M:0 Número;
+F:0 Número;

LEXICON Número
+SG:0	#;
+PL:^s	#;
